Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 7
COLORADO WORKS PROGRAM

26-2-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Works Program Act".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1194, § 1, effective June 3.

26-2-702. Legislative intent.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Passage of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-193, and the federal "Deficit Reduction Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 2005", Pub.L. 109-171, gives the state a unique opportunity to develop and maintain a public assistance program that emphasizes placing recipients in work and supporting them in sustained employment with food stamps, child care assistance, and medicaid;

The federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-193, and the federal "Deficit Reduction Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 2005", Pub.L. 109-171, require increased local input in developing the state plan for public assistance under these laws and allow increased local control over the implementation of such state plan;

The federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-193, and the federal "Deficit Reduction Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 2005", Pub.L. 109-171, require additional training for local employees in the area of case management to assist in making recipients self-sufficient.

Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that it is in the state's best interests to adopt the Colorado works program set forth in this part 7.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1194, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1949, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-703. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Assistance" means any ongoing assistance payment or short-term assistance payment as those terms are described in section 26-2-706.6.

(2.5) "Assistance unit" means those family members who are participants in the Colorado works program and who are receiving cash assistance.

"Basic cash assistance grant" means cash assistance provided to a participant in the Colorado works program pursuant to section 26-2-709.

(3.5) (a) "Cash assistance" means cash, payments, vouchers, and other forms of benefits designed to meet a family's ongoing basic needs such as food, clothing, shelter, utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidental expenses. "Cash assistance" includes such benefits even when they are:

Provided in the form of payments by a TANF agency, or other agency on its behalf, to individual participants; and

Conditioned on participation in a work activity or community service.

Except as otherwise excluded in paragraph (c) of this subsection (3.5), "cash assistance" also includes supportive services provided to families who are not employed such as transportation and child care.

"Cash assistance" does not include:

Nonrecurrent, short-term benefits that:

Are designed to address a specific crisis situation or episode of need;

Are not intended to meet recurrent or ongoing needs; and

Will not extend beyond four months;

Work subsidies such as payments to employers or third parties to help cover the costs of employee wages, benefits, supervision, and training;

Supportive services such as child care and transportation provided to families who are employed;

Refundable earned income tax credits;

Contributions to, and distributions from, individual development accounts;

Services such as counseling, case management, peer support, child care information and referral, transitional services, job retention, job advancement, and other employment-related services that do not provide basic income support; and

Transportation benefits provided under a job access or reverse commute project to an individual who is not otherwise receiving assistance.

"Colorado child care assistance program" means the state program of child care assistance implemented pursuant to the provisions of part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 and rules of the executive director of the department of early childhood.

"Colorado works program" or "works program" means the program of public assistance created in this part 7.

(5.5) "Controlled substance" means a substance, a drug, or an immediate precursor included in schedules I to V of part 2 of article 18 of title 18, and any "alcohol beverage" as defined in section 44-3-103 (2).

(5.7) "Countable income" means the receipt by an individual of a gain or benefit in cash or in kind during a calendar month that is used to determine eligibility and the benefit amount for the Colorado works program as specified by the state board.

"County" means a county or a city and county.

"County block grant" means a block grant provided to a county pursuant to the provisions of section 26-2-712.

"County department" means:

The department of social services, human services, or health and human services of a county or a city and county; or

Any combination of departments of social services of a county or a city and county that are approved by the state department to implement a county block grant jointly pursuant to the provisions of section 26-2-718.

(8.5) "Deficit reduction omnibus reconciliation act" means the federal "Deficit Reduction Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 2005", Pub.L. 109-171, as amended.

"Dependent child" means a person who resides with a parent or a specified caretaker and who is under the age of eighteen years or, if the person is a full-time student at a secondary school or vocational or technical equivalent and is reasonably expected to complete the school or vocational or technical equivalent before attaining the age of nineteen years, is under nineteen years.

(9.5) "Disqualified or excluded person" means a person who would otherwise be a member of an assistance unit but who is rendered ineligible to participate due to program prohibitions.

"Federal law" means the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act, the deficit reduction omnibus reconciliation act, and any federal regulations adopted for the implementation of either act.

(10.2) "Guardian" means a person appointed by court order to be the guardian of another person.

(10.5) "Income" means any cash, payments, wages, in-kind receipts, inheritance, gifts, prizes, rents, dividends, interest, and other gain or benefit in cash or in kind received by members of an assistance unit.

"Indian tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe with part or all of its reservation located in the state of Colorado.

"Individual responsibility contract" or "IRC" means the contract entered into by the participant and the county department pursuant to section 26-2-708.

Repealed.

(13.5) "Noncustodial parent", as defined in 45 CFR 260.30, means a person who:

Is the parent of a minor child; and

Lives in Colorado; and

Does not live in the same household as the minor child.

(13.7) "Ongoing assistance" means any cash grant, benefit, service, or other form of temporary assistance designed to meet an eligible family's ongoing needs.

"Parent" means either a biological parent or a parent by adoption.

"Participant" means an individual who receives any assistance or who participates in a specific component of the Colorado works program.

"Performance contract" means the performance-based contract executed by the state department and the board of county commissioners of each county or the boards of county commissioners of a group of counties pursuant to section 26-2-715.

"Personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act" means the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-193, as amended.

(17.5) "Program prohibitions" means a circumstance that, pursuant to this part 7 or federal law, renders an individual unable to participate in the Colorado works program.

(17.7) "Qualified alien" means a qualified alien as defined by rule of the state board in conformance with the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act.

(17.8) "Receipt" or "receipt of income" means the date on which income is actually received by or becomes legally available to a member of an assistance unit.

"Reservation" means the Ute Mountain Ute Indian Reservation and the Southern Ute Indian Reservation in Colorado.

(18.2) "Short-term assistance" means a nonrecurrent, short-term benefit that is designed to deal with a specific crisis situation or episode of need, is not intended to meet recurrent or ongoing needs, and does not extend beyond four months.

(18.3) "Specified caretaker" means:

A person who exercises responsibility for a dependent child and who is:

A relative by blood, marriage, or adoption who is within the fifth degree of kinship to the dependent child; or

Appointed by the court to be the guardian or the legal custodian of the dependent child; or

A person who exercises responsibility for a dependent child within the person's home if there is no person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (18.3).

(18.5) "Targeted spending level" means the amount of county funds that a county shall appropriate pursuant to the provisions of section 26-1-122 for the purpose of defraying the county's maintenance of effort requirement for the works program.

"Temporary assistance for needy families" or "TANF" means the program of block grants from the federal government to the states to implement assistance programs pursuant to federal law.

"Tribal member" means an enrolled member of either the Ute Mountain Ute or Southern Ute Indian tribes.

"Work activities" shall have the same definition as is provided in federal law. The state board shall promulgate rules as necessary to further define "work activities" in accordance with the definition provided in federal law. Participants shall be considered to be engaged in work if they are participating in work activities as described in the federal law or if they are participating in other work activities designed to lead to self-sufficiency as determined by the county and as outlined in their IRC.

"Work participation rate" means the percentage of participants who are involved in work activities as required statewide under federal law.

"Works allocation committee" means the committee created pursuant to section 26-2-714 (6).

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1195, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(18.5) and (23) added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(5.5) added, p. 1361, § 5, effective June 3; (2.5), (9.5), and (17.5) added, p. 48, § 1, effective July 1; (3.5) added, p. 31, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3.5) amended, p. 24, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 2001:

(13.5) added, p. 723, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(5.7), (10.5), (17.7), (17.8), and (18.3) added, p. 799, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(17.7) amended, p. 1086, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

(3), (8), (10), (17), (17.5), (17.7), (19), (21), and (22) amended and (8.5), (13.7), and (18.2) added, p. 1950, § 2, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(13.5) amended, (SB 09-100), ch. 192, p. 837, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2010:

(1) and (13) repealed, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 316, § 12, effective April 15; (2), (9), and (18.3) amended and (10.2) added, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 548, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (HB 14-1317), ch. 259, p. 1041, § 9, effective May 22.

L. 2018:

(5.5) amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1080, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(4) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 856, § 93, effective July 1.

26-2-704. No individual entitlement.

Nothing in this part 7 or in any rules promulgated pursuant to this part 7 shall be interpreted to create a legal entitlement in any participant to assistance provided pursuant to the works program.

No county administering or implementing the works program with moneys from a county block grant as provided in section 26-2-714 may create or shall be deemed to create a legal entitlement in any participant to assistance provided pursuant to the works program.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 3.

26-2-705. Works program - purposes.

Effective July 1, 1997, the Colorado works program is implemented pursuant to the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act and is intended to comply with the express requirements for participation in the TANF block grant program.

Effective January 1, 2009, the Colorado works program is amended to ensure implementation in compliance with the deficit reduction omnibus reconciliation act.

The purposes of the works program are to:

Assist participants toward self-sufficiency, economic mobility, and family safety and stability by promoting job preparation, work, and marriage;

Provide assistance to needy families so that children may be cared for in their homes or in the homes of family members;

Prevent and reduce the incidence of pregnancies of unmarried individuals and to establish annual numerical goals for preventing and reducing the incidences of these pregnancies;

Encourage the formation and maintenance of two-parent families;

Develop strategies and policies that focus on supporting participants in the participants' employment and career goals, removing barriers to employment for participants, and ensuring that the state is able to meet work participation rates specified in the federal law; and

Allow the counties increased responsibility for the administration of the works program.

Nothing in this part 7 is intended to prevent a county or municipality from implementing a public assistance or general assistance program with local funds.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1953, § 3, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2018:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 756, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) and (2)(e) amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2481, § 2, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-706. Target populations.

Subject to the provisions of this section and restrictions in the federal law, those persons or families who may receive assistance under the Colorado works program include:

Dependent children under the age of eighteen;

Dependent children between the ages of eighteen and nineteen who are full-time students in a secondary school, home school, or in the equivalent level of vocational or technical training and expected to complete the program before age nineteen. Such children are eligible for assistance through the end of the month in which they complete the program. A dependent child is still considered to be a student in regular attendance during official school or training program vacation periods, absences due to illness, convalescence, or family emergency, or the month in which the child completes a school or training program.

For purposes of this subparagraph (II), "regular attendance" means that the student is enrolled in a program of study or training leading to a certificate or diploma and is physically attending such program or training; "full-time attendance" means that the student is attending school for a minimum of twenty-five hours per week, or an amount of time as specified by the school; and "half-time attendance" means that the student is attending school for a minimum of twelve hours per week, or an amount of time as specified by the school; and

The parents of a dependent child, including expectant parents, or a specified caretaker with whom the dependent child is living.

Either the child or the specified caretaker is temporarily absent from the home to receive medical treatment; or

The child is in a voluntary foster care placement for a period not expected to exceed three months.

In addition to the eligibility requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), in order to receive Colorado works benefits and assistance, the assistance unit shall include a dependent child who lives in the home of a parent or other specified caretaker. A dependent child is considered to be living in the home of a specified caretaker as long as the parent or other specified caretaker exercises responsibility for the care of the child even though one or more of the following occurs:

(I) The child is under the jurisdiction of the court; or

(II) Legal custody is held by an agency that does not have physical possession of the child; or

(III) The child is in regular attendance at school away from home; or

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the state board shall promulgate rules to provide that two-parent families shall be treated the same as single-parent families under the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the state board shall promulgate rules to provide that half siblings residing in the same household not be required to be in the same assistance unit if at least one of the half siblings is receiving child support. In such circumstance, the half sibling receiving child support shall be given the option to not participate in Colorado works.

The state board shall promulgate rules to provide that a noncustodial parent may be allowed to receive services under the Colorado works program, but not assistance, at a county's option and in accordance with the county's plan. Such services provided to a noncustodial parent pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be intended to promote the sustainable employment of the noncustodial parent and enable such parent to pay child support. Provision of such services shall not negatively impact the eligibility for benefits or services of the custodial parent.

(1.5) To participate in the Colorado works program an applicant or person shall:

Be a resident of Colorado;

Be a citizen of the United States, a qualified alien who entered the United States prior to August 22, 1996, or a qualified alien who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has been in a qualified alien status for a period of five years or, if less than five years, is in a federal exempt category pursuant to 8 U.S.C. sec. 1613 (b), as amended;

Not be receiving financial assistance from other financial assistance programs administered by the state of Colorado;

Not be an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient in a public medical institution;

Not be an inmate of any institution as a patient admitted for tuberculosis or a behavioral or mental health disorder, unless the person is a child under the age of twenty-one years receiving psychiatric care under medicaid;

Not be participating in a labor strike;

Provide a social security number or proof of application for a social security number if the social security number is unknown or if the applicant does not have a social security number;

Provide verification of earned income received in the thirty days immediately prior to the date of application; and

Provide verification of pregnancy, if applicable.

The state department shall promulgate rules to identify with specificity who may be a participant in the works program and the income requirements for participation in the works program. An asset test shall not be applied as a condition of eligibility for participation in the works program.

The rules shall provide that an unmarried parent under eighteen years of age shall not receive assistance unless such unmarried parent resides with his or her parent or other specified caretaker in an adult-supervised home or in any other arrangement approved by the county department.

In determining the income requirements pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the state department shall use an income conversion ratio for converting weekly and biweekly income to a monthly amount using the lowest ratio or methodology that results in the lowest monthly income amount allowable under federal law.

A person convicted of a drug-related felony offense under the laws of this state, any other state, or the federal government on or after June 3, 1997, is eligible for assistance under the works program.

The state board shall promulgate rules to simplify the requirements relating to determination and verification of eligibility criteria. Eligibility processes from other public assistance or entitlement programs may be used when redetermining and verifying eligibility. When possible, the state board is strongly encouraged to align redetermination and verification timelines with other public assistance or entitlement programs. Nothing in this subsection (4) authorizes the state board to amend or delete eligibility criteria for participation in the works program that the board is not otherwise authorized to amend or delete.

and (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 549, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 102, § 1, effective March 21; (1) amended, p. 723, § 7, effective May 31; (5)(b) repealed, p. 1170, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 904, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), IP(2), (2)(b), and (4) amended and (1)(a.5) and (1.5) added, pp. 800, 802, §§ 2, 3, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1.5)(b) amended, p. 1087, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(b) amended and (6) added, p. 592, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 2008:

IP(1)(a.5) and (1)(a.5)(IV) amended, p. 1953, § 4, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(III), IP(1)(a.5), (1)(a.5)(IV), (1)(d), (1.5)(h), (1.5)(i), (2), (5), and (6) amended, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 549, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(e) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1333, § 220, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(2)(c) added and (3) and (4) amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2481, § 3, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 01-1048 and House Bill 01-1264 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-706.5. Restrictions on length of participation - rules.

Unless cash assistance is provided through segregated funds pursuant to federal law and section 26-2-714, as of June 3, 1997, each month of cash assistance received by an assistance unit that includes a specified caretaker who has received assistance under Title IV-A of the social security act, as amended, shall count toward that specified caretaker's sixty-month lifetime maximum of TANF benefits as established in federal law.

Any month in which a specified caretaker is determined to be a disqualified or excluded person from a basic cash assistance grant shall count as a month of participation in the calculation of the specified caretaker's overall sixty-month lifetime maximum.

The county department shall, where available and applicable, provide for or refer a disqualified or excluded person to other appropriate services, including services that may assist the person toward self-sufficiency.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to create any entitlement for services or to require any county to expend resources in addition to existing appropriations.

No later than July 1, 2023, the state board shall promulgate rules:

Establishing statewide standards and procedures that require counties to offer extensions beyond the sixty-month lifetime maximum for all households that demonstrate good cause, which includes, but is not limited to, an applicant or participant who is:

A child-only case;

The head of a single parent household unit and has a child under one year of age; or

Experiencing hardship, as defined in rules promulgated by the state board; and

To address how the state will monitor extensions in relation to requirements under the federal law.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 49, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 142, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 2008:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1953, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 551, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2022:

(4) added, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2481, § 4, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-706.6. Payments and services under Colorado works - rules.

Subject to the provisions of federal law, rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to this section, and available appropriations, the payment types and services specified in this section are available to participants in the Colorado works program.

Ongoing assistance payment. An assistance unit that applies and is eligible for ongoing assistance shall, unless voluntarily and knowingly refused, receive cash assistance, which is a recurrent cash payment. In addition to a cash payment, an eligible assistance unit may also receive cash assistance in the form of a cash-equivalent payment, voucher, or other form of cash benefit that is designed to meet the basic ongoing needs of the persons in the assistance unit. Basic ongoing needs shall consist of food, clothing, shelter, utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidental expenses. In addition to cash assistance, persons in an assistance unit that is eligible for ongoing assistance may receive supportive services as described in this section.

Short-term assistance payment. A participant may choose to receive a short-term assistance payment, formerly referred to as a diversion payment, which is a nonrecurrent, needs-based, cash or cash-equivalent payment designed to meet the short-term needs of the participant. A short-term assistance payment is designed to address a specific crisis situation or episode of need and is not designed to meet the basic ongoing needs of the participant. A short-term assistance payment may not extend beyond four months. In addition to a short-term assistance payment, a participant who is eligible for short-term assistance may receive supportive services as described in subsection (4) of this section. Short-term assistance payments include the following types:

A standard short-term assistance payment, formerly referred to as a state diversion payment, is a nonrecurrent, needs-based, cash or cash-equivalent payment made to a participant who is eligible for short-term assistance.

An expanded short-term assistance payment, formerly referred to as a county diversion payment, is a nonrecurrent, needs-based, cash or cash-equivalent payment made to a participant who is eligible for assistance pursuant to the maximum eligibility criteria for nonrecurrent, short-term benefits established in the state plan pursuant to section 26-2-712 (1), in the county-defined expanded eligibility based on federal poverty and other standardized guidelines, and in county policies.

Supportive services.

An eligible participant may receive supportive services, including but not limited to:

Work subsidies such as payments to employers or third parties to help cover the costs of employee wages, benefits, supervision, and training;

Supportive services such as child care and transportation provided to families who are employed;

Refundable earned income tax credits;

Contributions to, and distributions from, individual development accounts;

Services such as counseling, case management, peer support, child care information and referral, transitional services, job retention, job advancement, and other employment-related services that do not provide basic income support; and

Transportation benefits provided under a job access or reverse commute project to an individual who is not otherwise receiving assistance.

A county may provide supportive services directly to an eligible participant or through a contract or memorandum of understanding between the county department and another agency, including but not limited to another county department or a community provider.

The state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to which a county shall provide referrals for available supportive services to persons who apply for assistance and to participants who are homeless or in need of mental health services or substance abuse counseling or services. The rules shall not obligate the county to pay for any supportive services to which a person who applies for ongoing assistance or short-term assistance or a participant is referred.

Individual development accounts. A county department may make available opportunities for participants to have individual development accounts for home purchase, business capitalization, or higher education in accordance with federal law.

Child care assistance. Subject to available appropriations and pursuant to rules promulgated by the executive director of the department of early childhood, a county may provide child care assistance to a participant pursuant to the provisions of part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 and rules promulgated by the executive director of the department of early childhood for implementation of said part 1.

Substance abuse control program. A county may elect to implement a Colorado works controlled substance abuse control program. Under such a program, if the use of a controlled substance prevents the participant from successfully participating in his or her work activity, the county department may require the participant to participate in a controlled substance abuse control program based in whole or in part upon a representation by the participant that he or she is using controlled substances or upon a finding by the county department pursuant to an assessment by a certified substance use disorder treatment provider that the participant is or is likely to be using controlled substances. If a county chooses to require the participant to participate in a controlled substance abuse control program, the county department shall:

Require the participant to be assessed by a certified substance use disorder treatment provider and to follow a rehabilitation plan as a condition of continued receipt of assistance under the works program. The rehabilitation plan must be based upon the assessment and developed by a certified substance use disorder treatment provider, and may include, but need not be limited to, participation in a substance use disorder treatment program. This subsection (7)(a) does not create an entitlement to rehabilitation services or to payment for rehabilitation services.

If required by the rehabilitation plan, conduct random testing of the participant to determine whether he or she is remaining free of controlled substances; and

Impose on the participant any applicable adverse action for nonparticipation in a work activity if the participant fails to follow the rehabilitation plan, which nonparticipation may be evidenced by having a positive result on a random test or refusing to participate in a random test pursuant to this subsection (7). A county may not take adverse action against a participant for failing to meet the requirements of the rehabilitation plan if the services required under the plan are not available, if transportation or child care is not available, or if the costs of the services are prohibitive.

Job skills education voucher. A county department may provide a voucher created pursuant to the provisions of section 26-2-712 (11) to a participant for use at one of the community or technical colleges administered pursuant to the provisions of article 60 of title 23, C.R.S., for the purpose of securing short-term educational and academic skills training and job placement services.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1954, § 6, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2017:

IP(7) and (7)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1334, § 221, effective May 25; (9) added, (SB 17-292), ch. 271, p. 1493, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(6) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 856, § 94, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9)(g) provided for the repeal of subsection (9), effective September 1, 2021. (See L. 2017, p. 1493.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-2-707. Diversion grant. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1199, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1957, § 7, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-707.5. Community resources investment assistance.

A county department may use county block grant moneys to invest in the development of community resources that support the purposes of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act", Public Law 104-193, and that are designed to assist eligible applicants or participants under section 26-2-706 or 26-2-706.6. An eligible applicant or participant may receive benefits or services from such a community resource without completing an application pursuant to section 26-2-106 or an individual responsibility contract pursuant to section 26-2-708 (2). However, nothing in this subsection (1) precludes a county department from requiring such applications and individual responsibility contracts in a county's individual contracting procedures established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The state board shall establish standards and procedures through rules for the use of county block grant moneys pursuant to this section including but not limited to the contracting procedures counties must follow to ensure that funds are being spent to support TANF-eligible applicants or participants. Such contracting procedures shall include a requirement that a county's contract with a provider shall specify the approximate number of applicants or participants to be served by the provider. Counties shall also be required to adopt official written policies as referenced in section 26-2-716 (2.5) regarding the types of community resources in which counties are investing, the purposes of such community resource investments, the income eligibility standards, and the county's dispute resolution processes.

A county that uses county block grant moneys pursuant to this section shall use all moneys in accordance with all applicable federal and state statutes and regulations.

A county shall not be authorized to use funds pursuant to this section for the purpose of supplanting funds.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a household from applying for and receiving basic cash assistance.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 660, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1957, § 8, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-707.7. Information concerning immunization of children.

At the time of application for the works program, the county department shall provide information concerning immunizations to all applicants, including the exemptions listed in section 25-4-903, C.R.S. The information shall include parent education on vaccines and information concerning where to access vaccines in the local community. The department of public health and environment or the county or district public health agency shall provide the immunization information to the county department.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 548, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.